Washington statutes.
RCW 18.122.030

Registration, certification, and licensure.

(1) The three levels of professional credentialing as defined in chapter 18.120 RCW are:

(a) Registration, which is the least restrictive, and requires formal notification of the department of health identifying the practitioner, and does not require qualifying examinations;

(b) Certification, which is a voluntary process recognizing an individual who qualifies by examination and meets established educational prerequisites, and which protects the title of practice; and

(c) Licensure, which is the most restrictive and requires qualification by examination and educational prerequisites of a practitioner whose title is protected and whose scope of practice is restricted to only those licensed.

(2) No person may practice or represent oneself as a practitioner of a health profession by use of any title or description of services without being registered to practice by the department of health, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

(3) No person may represent oneself as certified or use any title or description of services without applying for certification, meeting the required qualifications, and being certified by the department of health, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

(4) No person may represent oneself as licensed, use any title or description of services, or engage in any practice without applying for licensure, meeting the required qualifications, and being licensed by the department of health, unless otherwise exempted by this chapter.

[ 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 308; 1987 c 150 s 63.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Severability—1989 1st ex.s. c 9: See RCW 43.70.910 and 43.70.920.